Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-210
Oil or gas lease; authority of executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or trustee to execute; ratification of unauthorized or defective lease; how obtained.

Proceedings may be had in the county court of the county in which an estate or trust is being administered or proceedings for guardianship or conservatorship are being had or in the county court of the county in which real estate is situated, for authority to lease any interest in real estate, or any part thereof, of any deceased person, beneficiary of a trust, minor, incompetent, or person unfit by reason of infirmities of age or physical disability or to ratify any prior unauthorized or defective lease executed by any executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or trustee. If it shall appear to the court or judge thereof sitting in chambers within the district to be for the advantage of the estate of any decedent, beneficiary of a trust, minor, incompetent person, or person unfit by reason of infirmities of age or physical disability to make a lease, ratification agreement, or contract for the exploration and development or pooling or unitization of the real property of the estate or trust, or any part thereof, for oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons, the court or judge, as often as occasion therefor shall arise in the administration of any estate or trust, or in the course of any guardianship matter, or in the course of administration by a conservator, may on a petition, notice, and hearing, as provided in sections 57-211 and 57-212, authorize, empower, and direct the executor, administrator, trustee, conservator, or the guardian of such minor or incompetent person to lease such real estate or any part thereof or enter into pooling or unitization contracts.

Laws 1939, c. 69, § 1, p. 281;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 57-210;

R.S.1943, § 57-210;

Laws 1947, c. 199, § 1, p. 643;

Laws 1951, c. 191, § 1, p. 701;

Laws 1953, c. 190, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1955, c. 215, § 1, p. 603;

Laws 1959, c. 259, § 1, p. 895;

Laws 1967, c. 350, § 1, p. 928;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 262.